Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2324YC (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.87 related to replacing references 4 to the âGulf of Mexicoâ and âDenaliâ in classroom instruction 5 and handouts. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 279.87 related to replacing references 10 to the âGulf of Mexicoâ and âDenaliâ in classroom instruction 11 and handouts. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Classroom instruction and 13 handouts ââ Gulf of America and Mount McKinley. 14 1. In all classroom instruction, and in all handouts 15 provided to students, the school district shall replace 16 references to the âGulf of Mexicoâ with references to the âGulf 17 of Americaâ. 18 2. In all classroom instruction, and in all handouts 19 provided to students, the school district shall replace 20 references to âDenaliâ with references to âMount McKinleyâ. 21